Colorado statutes. TITLE 17 Corrections
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

17-26-101. Jail in each county.

There shall be maintained in each county in this state, at the expense of the county, a county jail for the detention, safekeeping, and confinement of persons and prisoners lawfully committed. Nothing in this article shall be construed to compel the erection of jails in counties having a population of less than two thousand or when the county owns a jail erected in any other place in the county.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 935, § 10, effective August 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-26-101 as it existed prior to 1977.

17-26-102. Keeper of jail - expenses.

The sheriff of the county, in person or by deputy appointed for that purpose, shall be the keeper of the county jail. He shall be responsible for the manner in which the same is kept. He shall see that the same is kept clean, safe, and wholesome. The expenses of keeping the jail in good order and repair and of lighting and warming that part thereof wherein prisoners are confined and the office in the jail shall be paid by the county wherein the jail is situated. Nothing in this section shall authorize the lighting or warming of that part of the jail occupied by the keeper thereof as his dwelling house.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 935, § 10, effective August 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-26-102 as it existed prior to 1977.

Cross references:

For the sheriff as custodian of the jail, see also § 30-10-511.

17-26-103. Duties of keeper.

The keepers of the several county jails and adult detention centers in this state shall receive and safely keep every person duly committed or placed pursuant to section 16-11-308.5, C.R.S., to such jail or adult detention center for safekeeping, examination, or trial or duly sentenced to imprisonment in such jail or adult detention center upon conviction for any contempt or misconduct or for any criminal offense, and they shall not without lawful authority let out of such jail, on bail or otherwise, any such person.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 935, § 10, effective August 1.

L. 88:

Entire section amended, p. 677, § 3, effective July 1; entire section amended, p. 710, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 407, § 5, effective April 19.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-26-103 as it existed prior to 1977.

Cross references:

For use of physical force to maintain order and discipline, see § 18-1-703 (1)(b).

17-26-104. Feeding prisoners.

The sheriff of each county shall feed all the prisoners kept in confinement by him with good and sufficient food. The board of county commissioners of such county, at the expense of the county, shall furnish to such sheriff all the groceries, supplies, utensils, equipment, and assistants he requires to perform his duty of properly feeding such prisoners and shall also pay all the costs and expenses incurred therein.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 936, § 10, effective August 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-26-104 as it existed prior to 1977.

17-26-104.3. Menstrual hygiene products for a person in custody - definitions.

A facility, as defined in subsection (2) of this section, whether operated by a governmental entity or a private contractor, shall provide whichever menstrual hygiene products are requested by a person in custody to the person in custody at no expense to the person in custody. The facility shall not impose any condition or restriction on a person in custody's access to menstrual hygiene products.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Facility" means:

A local jail, as defined in section 17-1-102 (7);

A multijurisdictional jail, as described in section 17-26.5-101; and

A municipal jail, as authorized in section 31-15-401 (1)(j).

"Menstrual hygiene products" means tampons, menstrual pads, sanitary napkins, and pantiliners.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (HB 19-1224), ch. 131, p. 589, § 4, effective April 25.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 19-1224, see section 1 of chapter 131, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

17-26-104.4. Incarceration of a person with the capacity for pregnancy - report - definition.

A facility incarcerating a person who is capable of pregnancy, whether operated by a governmental entity or a private contractor, shall:

Train the facility's staff to ensure that a pregnant person receives safe and respectful treatment;

Develop administrative policies to ensure a trauma-informed standard of care is integrated with current practices to promote the health and safety of a pregnant person;

Provide each pregnant person, during the person's pregnancy and through the person's postpartum period, with access to:

Perinatal health-care providers with perinatal experience; and

Healthy foods and information on nutrition, recommended activity levels, safety measures, and supplies, including menstrual products as required in section 17-26-104.3, and breast pumps approved by the sheriff or the sheriff's designee;

Provide treatment for pregnant people who have suffered from:

A diagnosed behavioral, mental health, or substance use disorder;

Human immunodeficiency virus; or

Chronic conditions;

Provide educational information materials for pregnant people who have suffered from:

Trauma or violence, including domestic violence;

Sexual abuse; or

Pregnancy loss or infant loss;

Provide evidence-based pregnancy and childbirth education, parenting support, and other relevant forms of health literacy;

Develop administrative policies to identify and offer opportunities for postpartum persons to maintain contact with the person's newborn child to promote bonding, including enhanced visitation policies, access to prison nursery programs, and breastfeeding support, when appropriate;

In accordance with the requirements of the federal "Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996", as amended, Pub.L. 104-191, transfer health records to community providers if a pregnant person exits the criminal justice system during the person's pregnancy or during the person's postpartum period;

Connect a person exiting the criminal justice system during the person's pregnancy or postpartum period to community-based resources, such as referrals to health-care providers, substance use disorder treatment, and social services that address social determinants of maternal health;

Establish partnerships with local public entities, private community entities, community-based organizations, Indian tribes and tribal organizations as defined in the federal "Indian Self-Determination and Education Assistance Act", 25 U.S.C. sec. 5304, as amended, or urban Indian organizations as defined in the federal "Indian Health Care Improvement Act", 25 U.S.C. sec. 1603, as amended; and

By February 15, 2022, and by February 15 each year thereafter, report to the judiciary committees of the senate and house of representatives, or their successor committees, on the number of births by pregnant people who are in the custody of the facility, including the location of the births, that occurred in the prior calendar year.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, "facility" means:

A local jail, as defined in section 17-1-102 (7);

A multijurisdictional jail, as described in section 17-26.5-101; or

A municipal jail, as authorized in section 31-15-401 (1)(j).

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-193), ch. 433, p. 2861, § 5, effective September 7.

17-26-104.5. Medical visits - charge to persons in custody - provider charges - state hospital in Pueblo.

A county jail may assess a medical treatment charge against any person who receives while being held in custody medical treatment performed by a physician, dentist, nurse, or licensed hospital or as a result of a sick call or for whom a prescription is filled. The county jail may assess any such medical treatment charge against the person's jail account. In addition, the county jail may assess a reasonable medical treatment charge for each visit by a person in custody to an institutional or noninstitutional physician, dentist, or optometrist; except that a medical treatment charge shall not be assessed for any visit required by the county jail during the intake process or an annual physical examination required by the county jail. In no case shall a person's inability to pay be the basis for not providing medical treatment equivalent to the community standard of care. Any medical treatment charge that remains unpaid shall constitute a cost of care that the person shall be ordered to pay pursuant to section 18-1.3-701, C.R.S., and that may be collected by the county pursuant to the provisions of section 16-11-101.6, C.R.S.

(1.3) A provider of medical care that receives any state money, including but not limited to providers that receive money from the medical assistance program established in articles 4, 5, and 6 of title 25.5, C.R.S., or the Colorado indigent care program established in part 1 of article 3 of title 25.5, C.R.S., shall charge a county for medical care provided to a person in custody in a county jail:

At the same rate that the provider is reimbursed for such services by the medical assistance program; or

If the provider is not reimbursed by the medical assistance program, at the highest rate that the provider is reimbursed in whole or in part with state moneys in any other program.

(1.5) (a) If economical, a county sheriff may transport a person held in custody in a county jail to the Colorado mental health institute at Pueblo for medical treatment. Within the bed and medical capacity of the facility, the Colorado mental health institute at Pueblo shall provide medical care to a person held in custody in a county jail. The county in which the person was held shall be responsible for the payment to the hospital for medical costs incurred by a person in custody, but, if such costs are not repaid to the county by the person in custody, such costs constitute a medical treatment charge that may be collected as provided for in subsection (1) of this section.

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1.5), the mental health institute at Pueblo shall charge a county the actual costs of the medical care provided to a person held in custody. The charges shall cover the full direct and indirect costs of the care provided as determined by generally accepted accounting principles. The general assembly shall include within the appropriation for the general medical division of the institute an amount equal to the estimated reimbursements to be received from counties pursuant to this paragraph (b).

The provisions of this section shall apply to any person held in custody in a county jail regardless of whether the person is a juvenile, is being held prior to trial, or is in custody for conviction under a state statute or a county or municipal ordinance.

When a person is held in custody in a county jail, the person shall be primarily responsible for the payment of the cost of medical care provided to the person for a self-inflicted injury or a condition that was preexisting prior to the person's arrest and shall be charged for the medical care by the provider of care. For purposes of this section, "preexisting condition" means an illness beginning or an injury sustained before a person is in the peaceable custody of the county's officers. This subsection (3) shall not apply to care required by the county jail pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, care paid for by other entities pursuant to section 17-26-120 or 17-26-124, care paid for by any other entity, or medical care provided by the Colorado mental health institute at Pueblo.

A county may seek payment or reimbursement for any medical treatment costs from a person being held in custody and receiving such services, except as otherwise provided in subsection (1) of this section.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 191, § 1, effective April 1.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 1507, § 166, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 1890, § 1, effective August 6; (1.3) and (1.5) added, p. 1694, § 3, effective August 6.

L. 2006:

IP(1.3) amended, p. 2005, § 59, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsection (1), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

17-26-104.7. Prohibition against the use of restraints on pregnant persons in custody.

The staff of a county jail, in restraining a woman who is committed, detained, or confined to the county jail, shall use the least restrictive restraints necessary to ensure safety if the staff of the county jail have actual knowledge or a reasonable belief that the woman is pregnant. The requirement that staff use the least restrictive restraints necessary to ensure safety shall continue during postpartum recovery and transport to or from the county jail.

The county jail staff or medical facility staff shall not use restraints of any kind on the woman during labor and delivery of the child; except that staff may use restraints if:
(2) (a) (I) The county jail staff or medical facility staff shall not use restraints of any kind on the woman during labor and delivery of the child; except that staff may use restraints if:

The medical staff determine that restraints are medically necessary for safe childbirth;

The county jail staff or medical staff determine that the woman presents an immediate and serious risk of harm to herself, to other patients, or to medical staff; or

The sheriff or his or her designee determines that the woman poses a substantial risk of escape that cannot reasonably be reduced by the use of other existing means.

Notwithstanding any provision of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a) to the contrary, under no circumstances shall staff use leg shackles or waist restraints on a woman during labor and delivery of the child, postpartum recovery while in a medical facility, or transport to or from a medical facility for childbirth.

The county jail or medical facility staff authorizing the use of restraints on a pregnant person during labor or delivery of the child shall make a written record of the use of the restraints, which record shall include, at a minimum, the type of restraint used, the circumstances that necessitated the use of the restraint, and the length of time the restraint was used. The sheriff shall retain the record for a minimum of five years and shall make the record available for public inspection with individually identifying information redacted from the record unless the person who is the subject of the record gives prior written consent for the public release of the record. The written record of the use of restraint shall not constitute a medical record under state or federal law. No later than February 15, 2022, and each February 15 thereafter, the sheriff shall submit the records created pursuant to this subsection (2)(b) in the prior calendar year to the judiciary committees of the senate and house of representatives, or their successor committees.

Upon return to a county jail after childbirth, the woman shall be entitled to have a member of the county jail's or county's medical staff present during any strip search.

When a woman's pregnancy is determined, the staff of a county jail shall inform a pregnant woman committed, detained, or confined in a county jail in writing in a language and in a manner understandable to the woman of the provisions of this section concerning the use of restraints and the presence of medical staff during a strip search.

Each sheriff shall ensure that staff of the county jail receive adequate training concerning the provisions of this section.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (SB 10-193), ch. 312, p. 1464, § 2, effective January 1, 2011.

L. 2021:

(2)(b) amended, (SB 21-193), ch. 433, p. 2863, § 6, effective September 7.

17-26-104.9. Opioid treatment for a person in custody - definitions - repeal.

A facility, whether operated by a governmental entity or private contractor, may make available opioid agonists and opioid antagonists to a person in custody with an opioid use disorder. The facility is strongly encouraged to maintain the treatment of the person throughout the duration of the person's incarceration, as medically necessary.

This subsection (1) is repealed, effective July 1, 2023.

(1.5) By July 1, 2023, a facility, whether operated by a governmental entity or private contractor, shall provide medication-assisted treatment, and other appropriate withdrawal management care to a person with a substance use disorder through the duration of the person's incarceration, as medically necessary. At a minimum:

The facility shall perform a nonmedical evaluation, consistent with guidelines developed by the behavioral health administration, of the person upon entry into custody at the facility for recent substance use.

The facility shall offer medication approved by the federal food and drug administration that is approved to treat opiate use disorder, which must include agonists, partial agonists, and antagonists, to a person in custody with an opiate use disorder. The person, in collaboration with the treating provider, must be given a choice concerning what medication is prescribed, and the facility must provide the medication requested. A person may request to change their medication at any time while in custody.

If the person indicates that the person has a substance use disorder, or the nonmedical evaluation performed pursuant to subsection (1.5)(a) indicates that the person may have recently used a substance, the facility shall refer the person to the facility's medical provider for an evaluation and subsequent diagnosis, prescription, or induction of medication-assisted treatment.

If the person indicates that the person was taking medication that is approved by the federal food and drug administration prior to entry into custody at the facility to treat a substance use disorder, the facility shall provide the same medication to the person while the person is in custody.

Qualified medication administration personnel may, in accordance with a written physician's order, administer opioid agonists and opioid antagonists pursuant to subsection (1) and (1.5) of this section.

A facility may contract with community-based health providers, local providers, or state mobile medication-assisted treatment unit providers for the implementation of this section.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Facility" means:

A local jail, as defined in section 17-1-102 (7);

A multijurisdictional jail, as described in section 17-26.5-101; and

A municipal jail, as authorized in section 31-15-401 (1)(j).

"Opioid agonist" means a full or partial agonist that is approved by the federal food and drug administration for the treatment of an opioid use disorder.

"Opioid antagonist" means naltrexone or any similarly acting drug that is not a controlled substance and that is approved by the federal food and drug administration for the treatment of an opioid use disorder.

Counties are encouraged to use county funding available from a settlement or damage award from opiate-related litigation to support jails in complying with the requirements of this section.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire section added, (HB 20-1017), ch. 288, p. 1423, § 2, effective September 14.

L. 2022:

(1), (2), and (3) amended and (1.5) and (5) added, (HB 22-1326), ch. 225, p. 1667, § 45, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (5) was numbered as (4) in HB 22-1326 but was renumbered on revision for ease of location.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1326 stating the purpose of, and the provision directing legislative staff agencies to conduct, a post-enactment review pursuant to § 2-2-1201 scheduled in 2025, see sections 1 and 55 of chapter 225, Session Laws of Colorado 2022. To obtain a copy of the review, once completed, go to "Legislative Resources and Requirements" on the Colorado General Assembly's website.

17-26-105. Separation of prisoners.

Persons committed on criminal process and detained for trial and persons committed for contempt or upon civil process shall be kept in rooms separate and distinct from those in which prisoners convicted and under sentence are confined. This section shall not apply to any county whose jail does not have sufficient room for such separate confinement.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 936, § 10, effective August 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-26-105 as it existed prior to 1977.

17-26-106. Male and female prisoners.

Male and female prisoners, except husband and wife, shall not be put or kept in the same room.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 936, § 10, effective August 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-26-106 as it existed prior to 1977.

17-26-107. Prisoners to work - work outside of jail - expenses.

When any able-bodied prisoner is confined in the county jail of any county or city and county, having been convicted of a misdemeanor or of the violation of a municipal ordinance and being confined in punishment therefor, the sheriff of such county or the person having the duties of a sheriff of such city and county shall compel such prisoner to work eight hours of every working day. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any case where there are fewer than three prisoners so confined in said jail at any one time or to any prisoner physically unable to work. In counties and city and counties, it shall be discretionary with the sheriff or person having the duties of a sheriff to employ prisoners on the road serving sentences of sixty or fewer days. It is the duty of the sheriff of such county or the sheriff or person having the duties of a sheriff of such city and county, when no other work is available, to compel the prisoners to work upon the public roads, highways, or streets of such county or city and county. Employment as a jail trusty shall be sufficient to meet the requirements of this section.

The county commissioners of the county or the governing body of the city and county, when informed by the sheriff or person having the duties of a sheriff that there are prisoners confined in the jail who may be put to work upon the roads, highways, or streets, if there is such work upon the roads, highways, or streets, shall provide for the payment of additional expenses of guarding such prisoners while performing such work. Such prisoners shall not be used for the purpose of building any bridge or structure of like character that requires the employment of skilled labor.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2000, p. 1120, § 1, effective August 2, 2000.)

Except as described by the terms of a judgment, any person sentenced to and confined in the county jail shall perform labors under such rules and regulations as may be prescribed by the county commissioners or sheriff of the county in which the jail is situated.

Upon the written request of a majority of the board of county commissioners of any county, the sheriff shall detail such inmates in the county jail as in his or her judgment seems proper, not exceeding the number specified in the written request, to work upon such public roads and highways of the county or streets and alleys of any municipality within the county as are designated in the written request of the county commissioners. The county shall furnish all tools and materials necessary in the performance of the work. No such work shall be done within the limits of a municipality without the consent of the proper authorities thereof, but when such work is done within the limits of a municipality within such county, the municipality where the work is done shall pay all additional expenses of guarding the inmates while they perform the work and shall furnish all tools and necessary materials used in the work.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 936, § 10, effective August 1.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1120, § 1, effective August 2.

L. 2017:

(4) and (5) added, (HB 17-1015), ch. 71, p. 223, § 2, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-26-107 as it existed prior to 1977.

17-26-108. County to support spouse - when.

When any able-bodied person is confined in the county jail, having been convicted of the nonsupport of his or her spouse or minor children, the county shall pay toward the support of such spouse or minor children not less than fifty cents nor more than one dollar per day for each day such person so works if such spouse or minor children would otherwise be a public charge.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 937, § 10, effective August 1.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 1636, § 29, effective July 19.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-26-108 as it existed prior to 1977.

Cross references:

For commitment of person for nonsupport, see § 14-6-101.

17-26-109. Deductions of time - record keeping - forfeitures - definition.

Every person who is sentenced to and imprisoned in any county jail of this state who performs faithfully the duties assigned to him or her and conducts himself or herself in accordance with the rules of the jail earns deductions from the time of his or her sentence as follows:

An inmate receives a seven-day deduction for each thirty days on his or her sentence which shall be calculated on a pro-rated basis from the commencement of the sentence, all or part of which is subject to forfeiture if the inmate is found to have violated any of the rules and regulations of the jail or has not faithfully accepted or completed the duties assigned to him or her;

In addition to the deduction described in subsection (1)(a) of this section, an inmate may receive a three-day deduction for each thirty days on his or her sentence if he or she:

Successfully completes a designated program or educational activity within the jail or is designated by the county sheriff as a trusty prisoner;

Is engaged in work within or outside the walls of the jail;

Performs his or her work in a credible manner;

Conducts himself or herself in accordance with the rules of the jail; and

Is approved by the sheriff to receive a deduction pursuant to this subsection (1)(b);

In addition to the deductions described in subsection (1)(a) of this section, an inmate may receive a three-day maximum deduction when the inmate takes an unusual or extraordinary action, as determined by the county sheriff. This deduction may be granted on an incident-by-incident basis and is not subject to the deduction cap described in subsection (1)(a) of this section.

If a county sheriff awards a deduction pursuant to this subsection (1)(c), the county sheriff shall notify the chief judge of the judicial district where the defendant was convicted of the award not later than three business days after the deduction is awarded. When providing the notice, the sheriff shall indicate how many days were deducted and the nature of the unusual or extraordinary action taken by the inmate.

Repealed.

In addition to the deductions described in subsections (1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(c), and (1)(d) of this section, an inmate may receive a three-day maximum deduction when the inmate takes an unusual or extraordinary action, as determined by the county sheriff. This deduction may be granted on an incident-by-incident basis and is not subject to the deduction cap described in subsection (1)(e) of this section.

If a county sheriff awards a deduction pursuant to this subsection (1)(f), he or she shall notify the chief judge of the judicial district of such fact not later than three business days after the deduction is awarded. In providing such notice, the sheriff shall indicate how many days were deducted and the nature of the unusual or extraordinary action taken by the inmate.

Each county jail shall keep a record of each inmate's deductions of time and changes in deductions of time as a result of policy violations by the inmate.

If an inmate is found to have committed a willful violation of any of the rules or regulations of the jail, the sheriff of the county in which the jail is situated shall determine whether the inmate shall forfeit some or all of the deductions from the inmate's sentence through implementation of a process as outlined in a policy provided to all inmates, which is applied consistently and complies with the best practices for correctional settings.

If an inmate escapes or attempts to escape from a jail or an alternative sentence program, he or she forfeits all deductions from his or her sentence that he or she received up to the time of the escape or attempted escape.

An inmate who is sentenced to any alternative sentence pursuant to section 18-1.3-106 arising out of a sentence pursuant to section 42-4-1307 (5)(a)(I), (5)(b), or (6)(a)(I) may receive a sentence deduction pursuant to this section only after serving any mandatory period of time pursuant to those sections.

As used in this section, "day" means a twenty-four-hour calendar day.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 937, § 10, effective August 1.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (HB 09-1263), ch. 105, p. 382, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (HB 17-1015), ch. 71, p. 221, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2021:

IP(1), (1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(c), (2), and (3)(a) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3164, § 176, effective March 1, 2022; (1)(e)(II) added by revision, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, pp. 3164, 3331, §§ 176, 803.

L. 2022:

(1)(b)(I) amended, (HB 22-1229), ch. 68, p. 343, § 15, effective March 1.

17-26-110. Forfeiture of good time. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 937, § 10, effective August 1.

L. 2017:

Entire section repealed, (HB 17-1015), ch. 71, p. 224, § 3, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former § 27-26-110 as it existed prior to 1977.

17-26-110.5. Restriction of privileges because of lawsuit filed without justification. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 95:

Entire section added, p. 301, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

Entire section repealed, (HB 17-1015), ch. 71, p. 224, § 4, effective August 9.

17-26-111. Separate sentences continuous.

For the purpose of section 17-26-109, when any such persons confined in the county jail are sentenced under several convictions, with separate sentences, they shall be construed as one continuous sentence.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 937, § 10, effective August 1.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (HB 17-1015), ch. 71, p. 224, § 5, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-26-111 as it existed prior to 1977.

17-26-112. Sheriff to keep record. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 937, § 10, effective August 1.

L. 2017:

Entire section repealed, (HB 17-1015), ch. 71, p. 224, § 6, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former § 27-26-112 as it existed prior to 1977.

17-26-113. Prisoners to work. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 937, § 10, effective August 1.

L. 2017:

Entire section repealed, (HB 17-1015), ch. 71, p. 225, § 7, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former § 27-26-113 as it existed prior to 1977.

17-26-114. Work on highways - expenses. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 937, § 10, effective August 1.

L. 2017:

Entire section repealed, (HB 17-1015), ch. 71, p. 225, § 8, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former § 27-26-114 as it existed prior to 1977.

17-26-115. Trusty prisoners - good time. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 937, § 10, effective August 1.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (HB 09-1263), ch. 105, p. 383, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2017:

Entire section repealed, (HB 17-1015), ch. 71, p. 225, § 9, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former § 27-26-115 as it existed prior to 1977.

17-26-116. Commitment - copy to sheriff - return endorsed.

When a prisoner is committed to any jail by virtue of any process which the sheriff is required to return to the court from which it issued, it is the duty of the court, clerk, or officer issuing such process to issue the same in duplicate, and the sheriff shall keep one copy of the same, together with a copy of his return thereto, endorsed thereon, which duplicate copy of such process retained by the sheriff shall be sufficient prima facie authority to retain such prisoner in custody.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 938, § 10, effective August 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-26-116 as it existed prior to 1977.

17-26-117. Commitment box - successor.

All instruments of every kind, or attested copies thereof duly certified, by which any person is committed to or liberated from the county jail shall be regularly endorsed and filed and kept in a suitable box in the jail by the sheriff, or by his deputy acting as jailer, and such box, together with its contents, shall be delivered to his successor in office.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 938, § 10, effective August 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-26-117 as it existed prior to 1977.